North Carolina, session 2025, HB38.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 66 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 52.
"Second Amendment Financial Privacy Act.
"§ 66-511. Legislative findings.
The General Assembly finds all of the following:
(1) The right of individuals to keep and bear arms is guaranteed under both the
Second Amendment to the United States Constitution and Section 30 of
Article I of the North Carolina Constitution.
(2) In September 2022, the International Organization for Standardization, based
in Switzerland, approved a new merchant category code for firearms
merchants.
(3) The new merchant category code would allow payment card networks and
others involved in payment card processing to identify and separately track
lawful payment card purchases at firearms merchants in North Carolina. This
surveillance would cause a significant chilling effect on individuals in North
Carolina wishing to exercise their federal and State constitutional rights to
keep and bear arms.
(4) In order to protect consumers in this State and promote lawful commerce in
this State, the Second Amendment Financial Privacy Act prohibits payment
card networks from using a firearms code or maintaining a firearms registry.
"§ 66-512. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Firearms code. – Any code or other indicator that identifies to a payment card
network any of the following:
a. Whether a person is a firearms merchant.
b. Whether a payment involves the purchase of a firearm or firearm
ammunition.
(2) Firearms merchant. – A person physically located in the State engaged in the
lawful business of selling or trading firearms or firearm ammunition.
(3) Payment card network. – An entity that: (i) directly or through licensed
members, processors, or agents, provides the proprietary services,
*H38-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
infrastructure, and software to route information and data for the purpose of
conducting electronic payment transaction authorization, clearance, and
settlement; and (ii) a merchant uses to accept as a form of payment a brand of
debit card, credit card, or other device that may be used to carry out electronic
payment transactions. This term does not include the following:
a. A bank holding federally insured deposits from individuals.
b. A credit union holding federally insured deposits from individuals.
"§ 66-513. Prohibitions.
(a) No payment card network shall use or permit a firearms code in connection with a
payment card transaction involving a firearms merchant located in this State.
(b) No payment card network shall knowingly maintain a record of individuals residing
in this State who own firearms.
(c) No payment card network shall discriminate against a firearms merchant based solely
on the assignment or nonassignment of a firearms code, including by refusing to serve on similar
terms or declining a lawful payment card transaction.
"§ 66-514. Enforcement; civil penalty.
(a) The Attorney General may investigate an alleged violation of this Article. After notice
and an opportunity for hearing, if the Attorney General determines that a payment card network
violated this Article, the Attorney General may assess a civil penalty of not more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. The clear proceeds of any penalty assessed pursuant
to this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with
G.S. 115C-457.2.
(b) The powers vested in the Attorney General by this Article are in addition to and do
not limit the ability of the Attorney General to take other enforcement action.
"§ 66-515. Civil liability for violation.
(a) Cause of Action. – A civil action may be brought against a payment card network for
violation of this Article by any of the following:
(1) A firearms merchant located in this State whose payment card transactions are
designated with a firearms code.
(2) A person that makes a payment card transaction with a firearms merchant
located in this State and whose payment card record includes a firearms code
for that transaction.
(3) An individual for whom a payment card network maintains a record of firearm
ownership.
(b) Relief and Damages. – A person authorized to institute a civil action by subsection
(a) of this section may seek and the court may award any or all of the following types of relief:
(1) An injunction to enjoin continued violation of this Article.
(2) Statutory damages in the amount of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each
instance of violation of this Article connected to the person filing the civil
action.
(3) Costs and attorneys' fees.
(c) Statute of Limitations. – No action shall be maintained under subsection (a) of this
section unless it is commenced no later than three years after the discovery of the violation of
this Article."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 38-Third Edition